Utah statutes.
7-19-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Failing or failed depository institution" means a depository institution under the jurisdiction of the department:

(a)  regarding which the commissioner makes a finding that any of the conditions set forth in Subsections 7-2-1(1)(a) through (k) exist;

(b)  that meets the requirements of Subsection 7-2-1(1)(l);

(c)  whose shareholders have consented to a supervisory action by the commissioner pursuant to Subsection 7-2-1(2); or

(d)  which is in the possession of the commissioner, or any receiver or liquidator appointed by the commissioner, pursuant to Chapter 2.

(2)  "Failing or failed depository institution holding company" means a depository institution holding company under the jurisdiction of the department:

(a)  regarding which the commissioner makes a finding that any of the conditions set forth in Subsections 7-2-1(1)(a) through (k) exist;

(b)  that meets the requirements of Subsection 7-2-1(1)(l);

(c)  whose shareholders have consented to a supervisory action by the commissioner pursuant to Subsection 7-2-1(2);

(d)  which is in the possession of the commissioner, or any receiver or liquidator appointed by the commissioner, pursuant to Chapter 2; or

(e)  whose subsidiary depository institution is a failing or failed depository institution.

(3)  "Supervisory acquisition" means the acquisition of control, the acquisition of all or a portion of the assets, or the assumption of all or a portion of the liabilities, pursuant to Section 7-2-1, 7-2-12, or 7-2-18, of a failing or failed depository institution or a failing or failed depository institution holding company, whether or not in the possession of the commissioner, by:

(a)  a Utah depository institution;

(b)   an out-of-state depository  institution;

(c)  a Utah depository institution holding company; or

(d)  an out-of-state depository  institution holding company.

(4)  "Supervisory merger" means the merger or consolidation, pursuant to Section 7-2-1, 7-2-12, or 7-2-18 of a failing or failed depository institution or a failing or failed depository institution holding company, whether or not in the possession of the commissioner, with:

(a)  a Utah depository institution;

(b)  an out-of-state depository  institution;

(c)  a Utah depository institution holding company; or

(d)  an out-of-state depository  institution holding company.



Amended by Chapter 49, 1995 General Session

